District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.55

Regional governmental entities.

(a)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a regional governmental entity shall be exempt from the requirements of this subchapter to the extent that the requirements of this subchapter impact on the regional governmental entity’s operations within the territory of a member government other than the District.

(b)

The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority shall be exempt from the requirements of this subchapter to the extent that the requirements of this subchapter are contrary to procurement regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes establishing the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2355, 52 DCR 7503
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2355 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).